Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.160

Educational activities in observance of Veterans Day.

During the school week preceding the eleventh day of November of each year, there shall be presented in each common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 educational activities suitable to the observance of Veterans Day.

The responsibility for the preparation and presentation of the activities approximating at least sixty minutes total throughout the week shall be with the principal or head teacher of each school building and such program shall embrace topics tending to instill a loyalty and devotion to the institutions and laws of this state and nation.

The superintendent of public instruction and each educational service district superintendent, by advice and suggestion, shall aid in the preparation of these activities if such aid be solicited.

[ 1990 c 33 s 241; 1985 c 60 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 120 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 45; 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 12. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 24; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 101; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.070; prior: 1955 c 20 s 3; prior: (i) 1939 c 21 s 1; 1921 c 56 s 1; RRS s 4899. (ii) 1921 c 56 s 2; RRS s 4900. (iii) 1921 c 56 s 3; RRS s 4901. Formerly RCW 28A.02.070, 28.02.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 4.28.080.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 15: "If any provision of this 1970 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 32.]

Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 15 s 12: "Notwithstanding any other provision of this 1970 amendatory act, the provisions of section 12 hereof shall not take effect until January 1, 1971 and only if at such time or thereafter chapter 223, Laws of 1969 ex. sess. is effective." [ 1970 ex.s. c 15 s 13.]

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.